Tennessee statutes. Title 43 Agriculture And Horticulture
Part 1

Commodity Dealer and Warehouse Law

43-32-101. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Commodity Dealer and Warehouse Law.”

Acts 1989, ch. 232, § 2.

Cross-References. Agriculture commodities promotion, title 43, chapter 29.

Commercial feed law, title 44, ch. 6.

Cooperative marketing associations, title 43, ch. 16.

Tobacco sales, title 43, ch. 19.

Warehouse receipts, bills of lading and other documents of title, title 47, ch. 7.

Warehouse storage of baled cotton, § 68-102-152.

Comparative Legislation. Commodity warehouses, dealers and producers:

Ala. Code § 2-31-1 et seq.

Ark. Code § 2-17-201 et seq.

Ga. O.C.G.A. § 2-9-30 et seq.

Ky. Rev. Stat. Ann. § 251.010 et seq.

Miss. Code Ann. § 75-43-1 et seq.

Mo. Rev. Stat. § 411-010 et seq.

N.C. Gen. Stat. § 106-429.1 et seq.

Va. Code § 3.1-722.16 et seq.

Collateral References. 78 Am. Jur. 2d Warehouses § 1 et seq.

93 C.J.S. Warehousemen and Safe Depositories § 1 et seq.

Warehousemen
6 et seq.

43-32-102. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Claimant” means:

Any producer or person, possessing warehouse receipts covering commodities owned or stored by the warehouseman;

Any person with written evidence of ownership, other than warehouse receipts, disclosing a storage obligation of a commodity warehouseman, including scale tickets, settlement sheets and ledger cards;

Any person who has lent money to a commodity warehouseman and who was to receive a warehouse receipt as security for that loan, but the commodity dealer or warehouseman failed within twenty-one (21) days after receiving the loan moneys and no warehouse receipt was issued;

Any person who has surrendered warehouse receipts as a part of a commodities sale transaction, the commodity warehouseman failed within twenty-one (21) days thereafter and the person surrendering the warehouse receipt did not get fully paid therefor; or

Any producer who possesses written evidence of the sale of commodities to a failed commodity dealer not limited to scale tickets, settlement sheets, price later contracts, basis contracts or similar commodities delivery contracts, but did not get fully paid therefor and who is unable to secure satisfaction of financial obligations due from a person licensed by the department in accordance with this chapter;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of agriculture, or the commissioner's designated representatives;

“Commodity” means grain;

“Commodity assets” means all commodities owned or stored by a failed commodity dealer or warehouseman, including commodities in transit that were shipped by the failed commodity dealer or warehouseman or failed warehouseman and for which payment has not been received; proceeds from sale or commodities due or to become due; the equity (net of any secured financing directly associated therewith) in assets in commodity exchange commodities margin accounts; any moneys due or to become due (net of any secured financing directly associated therewith) from any future contracts on any recognized commodity exchange; any other unencumbered funds or property or equity of the failed commodity dealer or warehouseman in funds or property wherever located that can be directly traced as being from the sale of commodities by the failed commodity dealer or warehouseman or failed warehouseman; provided, that any such funds, property, or equity in funds or property shall not be deemed to be encumbered unless the encumbrance results from good and valuable consideration advanced by any secured party on a bona fide basis; and provided further, that the encumbrance is not the result of the taking of the funds, property, or equity in funds or property as additional collateral for an antecedent debt; or other unencumbered funds, property, or equity in assets;

“Commodity dealer” means any person engaged in the business of buying commodities from producers thereof for resale or for milling or processing. A producer of commodities buying commodities for the producer's own use as seed or feed shall not be considered as being engaged in the business of buying commodities for resale or for milling or processing;

“Cooperative agreement” means any agreement made by the department with a person, local unit of government, or state or federal agency as may be reasonable and proper to carry out this chapter;

“Department” means the Tennessee department of agriculture;

“Failure” means:

An inability to financially satisfy a claimant in accordance with applicable statute or regulation and the time limits provided therein, if any;

A declaration of insolvency;

A revocation of license and leaving of outstanding indebtedness to claimants;

A failure to pay claimants in the ordinary course of business where a bona fide dispute does not exist between a commodity dealer or warehouseman and a customer;

A failure to apply for license renewal;

A denial of license renewal; or

A voluntary surrendering of a license;

“Grain” means corn, wheat, oats, rye, soybeans, rape seed, canola and grain sorghums;

“Incidental commodity dealer” means any commodities dealer who purchases commodities from producers and whose total purchases of commodities during any fiscal year do not exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000);

“Incidental commodity dealer, nonsecured” means a commodities dealer who purchases commodities from producers and whose total purchases during any fiscal year do not exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), and who has notified the commissioner on the dealer's license application or renewal application that the dealer has opted not to maintain a security instrument;

“Person” includes an individual, corporation, partnership and all associations of two (2) or more persons having a joint or common interest;

“Producer” means the owner, tenant or operator of land in this state who has an interest in and receives all or any part of the proceeds from the sale of the commodities produced thereon;

“Program” means the Tennessee commodity producer indemnity program;

“Stored commodities” means any commodities received in any commodities warehouse, located in this state, if such commodities are not purchased and beneficially owned by the commodities warehouseman;

“United States Warehouse Act” means the United States Warehouse Act, enacted August 11, 1916, as amended;

“Valid claim” means a claim arising from a failure of a commodity dealer or warehouseman that occurs after July 1, 1989, and adjudicated valid by the commissioner, net of all credits and offsets, and in accordance with § 43-32-210;

“Warehouse” or “commodities warehouse” means any building, structure, or other protected enclosure in this state used for the purpose of storing commodities for a consideration;

“Warehouse receipt” means:

A warehouse receipt issued under this chapter in accordance with the Uniform Commercial Code; or

A warehouse receipt issued under the United States Warehouse Act; and

“Warehouseman” or “commodities warehouseman” means any person who owns, controls or manages a public commodities warehouse in which commodities are stored for compensation and who is authorized to issue warehouse receipts, and includes any grain warehouse licensed under the United States Warehouse Act that has entered into a cooperative agreement.

Acts 1989, ch. 232, § 2; 1997, ch. 387, §§ 17-19; 2006, ch. 656, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. The United States Warehouse Act, referred to in this section, is codified primarily in 7 U.S.C. § 241 et seq.

43-32-103. Federally licensed commodity warehouses — Applicability.

Any commodity warehouse licensed under the United States Warehouse Act shall be subject to this chapter. However, any federally licensed commodity warehouse that meets the minimum requirements of the federal act shall be in compliance with the requirements of this part. All public commodity warehouses licensed under the United States Warehouse Act shall file with the commissioner a copy of their current license and a copy of all subsequent licenses or renewals so as to always have a copy of a current license on file with the commissioner.

Acts 1989, ch. 232, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. The United States Warehouse Act, referred to in this section, is codified primarily in 7 U.S.C. § 241 et seq.

43-32-104. Warehouse receipts.

The commissioner shall prescribe the form of all warehouse receipts, and no other character or form of warehouse receipt shall be issued except those so authorized.

Receipts must be issued for all commodities stored in a warehouse. Receipts need not be issued against nonstorage commodities, but each warehouseman shall keep accurate records of the weights, kinds, and grades, if graded, of all lots of nonstorage commodities received into and delivered from the warehouseman's warehouse.

No warehouse receipt shall be issued except on actual delivery of commodities into storage in the warehouse from which it purports to be issued, nor shall any receipt be issued for a greater quantity of commodities than was contained in the lot or parcel so received from storage, nor shall more than one (1) receipt be issued for the same lot of commodities, except in cases where a receipt for a part of a lot is desired, and then the aggregate receipts for a particular lot shall cover that lot and no more.

No warehouseman shall issue or aid the issuance of a receipt for commodities knowing that the commodities for which the receipt is issued and has not actually been received by the warehouseman or that the commodities are not under the warehouseman's actual control at the time of issuing the receipt.

Acts 1989, ch. 232, § 4.

43-32-105. Licensing requirements — Application.

No person shall engage in business as a commodity dealer or warehouseman in the state of Tennessee without a license therefor issued by the department.

Application for a license to engage in business as a commodity dealer or warehouseman shall be filed with the department and shall contain information and be in a form as prescribed by the department by lawfully promulgated rule.

The application for an initial license may be filed at any time prior to beginning business as a commodity dealer or warehouseman. However, the license shall terminate ninety (90) days after the close of the commodity dealer's or warehouseman's fiscal year.

The application for a renewal of a license shall be filed with the department annually within ninety (90) days after the close of the commodity dealer's or warehouseman's last completed fiscal year or within such further time, not exceeding sixty (60) days, as the department, upon application, may allow.

For all commodity dealer or warehouseman licenses, with the exception of incidental commodity dealers, nonsecured, the application shall be accompanied by a financial statement setting forth information as prescribed by the commissioner by lawfully promulgated rule.

The application for a license to operate as a commodity dealer or warehouseman, as defined in this chapter, or a renewal thereof, shall be accompanied by a filing fee of one hundred fifty dollars ($150). The application for a license to operate as an incidental commodity dealer as defined in this chapter, or a renewal thereof, shall be accompanied by a filing fee of fifty dollars ($50.00).

The license or renewal thereof issued by the department under this section shall be posted in the principal office of the licensee in this state. A certificate shall be posted in each location listed on a licensee's application where the licensee engages in the business of buying or storing commodities. In the case of a licensee operating a truck or tractor trailer unit, the licensee is required to have a certificate that the license is in effect, and that a bond or certificate of deposit has been filed, carried in each truck or tractor trailer unit used in connection with the purchase of commodities from producers. Upon request of a licensee and payment of the fee therefor, the department shall issue to the licensee a certificate that a license has been issued or renewed and a bond filed as required by this chapter.

The license issued to an incidental commodity dealer, nonsecured shall clearly state: “Producers are not eligible to receive indemnification from the Tennessee grain indemnity fund if payment is not made for commodities delivered to this dealer.” Additionally, this statement shall also be posted adjacent to the license issued to the dealer in the location required by this part. The notice shall be in print no smaller than two inches (2") in letter height. This statement shall also be placed on the receipt or scale ticket issued to the seller, with a place for the seller's signature provided on each receipt or scale ticket. The signature of the seller or the seller's representative shall be affixed to each receipt or scale ticket.

Acts 1989, ch. 232, § 5; 2006, ch. 656, §§ 2, 3.

43-32-106. Financial requirements — Security bonds — Insurance — Exemptions.

With the exception of incidental commodity dealers, nonsecured, every person licensed as a commodity dealer or warehouseman shall have a surety bond and a fire and extended coverage insurance policy, or proof thereof, both of which shall be noncancellable for the term of the license.

The surety bond shall provide a reasonable level of protection for those persons storing commodities in the warehouse or selling commodities to a dealer in the event of bankruptcy, fraud, or other occurrence that would deprive the person storing or selling commodities from recovering its value. This surety bond shall be in an amount established by the commissioner by duly promulgated rules. These bonding requirements are subject to a twenty thousand dollar ($20,000) minimum and a five hundred thousand dollar ($500,000) maximum limit.

The fire and extended coverage insurance policy shall be in an amount set by the commissioner by rule and regulation.

The bond and insurance policy shall be for the benefit of the persons storing commodities with the warehouseman, and shall be conditioned to provide the protection described in this section.

The premiums on the bond or insurance shall be paid by the licensee.

Any commodity dealer or warehouseman may file with the department, in lieu of a surety bond, a certificate of deposit or an irrevocable letter of credit payable to the department with the commissioner as trustee. The principal amount of the certificate shall be the same as that required for a surety bond under this chapter and the interest thereon shall be made payable to the purchaser thereof.

The surety bond or certificate of deposit in effect on the date of a warehouseman's license revocation, license suspension, cessation of operation or date of default as determined by the department shall be liable for and accrue liabilities not to exceed the principal of the surety bond or certificate of deposit.

When the department determines that an applicant's or licensee's ability to pay producers for commodities purchased is in question, or when it determines that a commodity dealer or warehouseman does not meet the financial requirements of this chapter, it may require additional collateral security. Such collateral security may include, but is not limited to, irrevocable letters of credit, certificates of deposit, commercial surety bonds, and, on a negotiated basis, mortgages or deeds of trust on real property, personal or corporate guarantees or other guarantees. Failure to post collateral security shall constitute grounds for suspension or revocation of a license issued under this chapter.

Any commodity dealer or warehouseman who is of the opinion that such person's net worth and assets are sufficient to guarantee payment to producers for commodities purchased or stored by that person may request the department to be relieved of the obligation of filing a bond in excess of the minimum bond of twenty thousand dollars ($20,000). The conditions under which such requests shall be granted shall be established by the commissioner in duly promulgated rules.

A commodity dealer shall be exempt from the bonding requirements of this section if the commodity dealer paid producers in full prior to or on the date of every delivery of commodities accepted for one (1) year prior to the date the request to be exempt is submitted to the department.

A commodity dealer exempt from bonding requirements under subsection (j) who pays less than the full amount for commodities prior to or upon delivery, issues a check at the time of delivery that is later dishonored for any reason, or takes any action subsequent to delivery that causes the producer to receive less than the full amount paid at delivery, shall file and maintain a surety bond in the amount required by this section.

Acts 1989, ch. 232, § 6; 2006, ch. 656, § 4; 2014, ch. 677, § 1.

Amendments. The 2014 amendment added (j) and (k).

Effective Dates. Acts 2014, ch. 677, § 3. April 14, 2014.

43-32-107. Inspections — License suspension or revocation.

The department shall examine or inspect each licensed commodity dealer or warehouseman at least once each calendar year. The department may inspect the premises used by any commodity dealer or warehouseman in the conduct of business at any time, and the books, accounts, records and papers of every licensed commodity dealer or warehouseman shall at all times during business hours be subject to inspection by the department. Each commodity dealer or warehouseman may also be required to make such reports of activities, obligations, and transactions as deemed necessary by the department to protect the producer as set forth in the rules and regulations.

If a commodity dealer or warehouseman violates any of the provisions of this chapter, that person's license and certificate of license may be removed from that person's premises by any department employee charged with the enforcement of this chapter and returned to the department. This removal shall constitute a suspension of the license, and the licensee may request a hearing before the commissioner within ten (10) days in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

If the department finds that a commodity dealer is licensed as a commodities warehouse under the United States Warehouse Act and does not satisfy the requirements of part 2 of this chapter, the commissioner shall suspend or revoke the dealer's license until such time as the commodities warehouse complies with the Tennessee Commodity Producer Indemnity Act, compiled in part 2 of this chapter.

If any court of competent jurisdiction issues any order restraining, overturning or modifying any order of the department that suspends or revokes a commodity dealer's or warehouseman's license, the department, its officers, employees and agents shall be held harmless from any liabilities or financial obligations arising out of the operations of the commodity dealer or warehouseman while operating under the court order.

Acts 1989, ch. 232, § 7; 1997, ch. 387, § 20.

Compiler's Notes. The United States Warehouse Act, referred to in this section, is codified primarily in 7 U.S.C. § 241 et seq.

43-32-108. Insolvency — Payment defaults.

If it is discovered that any commodity dealer or warehouseman is insolvent, or that its continuance in business will seriously jeopardize the interest of its creditors or commodities depositors, it is the duty of the commissioner to close that dealer or warehouseman and to take charge of all the property and effects thereof, and to notify the surety. Upon taking charge of any such dealer or warehouseman, the commissioner shall, as soon as practicable, ascertain by a thorough examination into its affairs, its actual financial condition, and whenever the commissioner becomes satisfied that the commodity dealer or warehouseman cannot resume business or liquidate its indebtedness to the satisfaction of its creditors, the commissioner shall report the fact of its insolvency to the attorney general and reporter, who shall immediately upon receipt of this notice institute proper proceedings in the proper court for the purpose of having a receiver appointed.

With the exception of incidental commodity dealers, nonsecured, if a commodity dealer or warehouseman fails or refuses to make payment for or deliver to a producer for commodities when requested, the producer shall notify the commissioner in writing of the failure or refusal within one hundred sixty (160) days of the date of sale or the date of delivery of the commodities to the commodity dealer or warehouseman, whichever is later, but in case of deferred pricing, delayed pricing, priced later, or similar contractual arrangements, no more than two hundred seventy (270) days after the date of delivery. The commissioner, upon receiving this notice, shall take whatever action is necessary. The producer furnishing written notice within the prescribed length of time is entitled to the benefits of the commodity dealer's or warehouseman's bond if such bond is required in accordance with § 43-32-106. However, if a producer fails to furnish written notice to the commissioner within the prescribed time, then that producer is not entitled to any benefits under the commodity dealer's or warehouseman's bond and part 2 of this chapter. Commodity dealer liability under price later contracts, open price contracts, deferred price contracts, or similar agreements shall accrue under the bond in effect at the date of default as determined by the commissioner.

With the exception of incidental commodity dealers, nonsecured, when the commissioner has determined that a commodity dealer has defaulted payment to producers for commodities that the dealer has purchased from them, or that a warehouseman failed to deliver value for commodities stored, the commissioner shall determine through appropriate legal procedures the producers and the amount of defaulted payment, and as trustee of the bond, shall immediately after such determination call for the commodity dealer's surety bond or bonds to be paid to the commissioner for distribution to those producers who should receive the benefits. Should the defaulted amount owed producers be less than the principal amount of the bond or bonds, then the surety shall be obligated to pay only the amount of the default.

Notwithstanding subsections (b) and (c), an incidental commodity dealer, nonsecured, by opting not to maintain a security instrument, causes the producers from whom the dealer purchases commodities to be ineligible to receive indemnification from the Tennessee grain indemnity fund in the event the dealer fails to make payment for the commodities delivered to the dealer.

Acts 1989, ch. 232, § 8; 2006, ch. 656, §§ 5-7; 2014, ch. 677, § 2.

Amendments. The 2014 amendment added “if such bond is required in accordance with § 43-32-106” at the end of the third sentence in (b).

Effective Dates. Acts 2014, ch. 677, § 3. April 14, 2014.

43-32-109. Violations — Penalties.

With the exception of incidental commodity dealers, nonsecured, failure of a commodity dealer or warehouseman to file a bond or certificate of deposit and to keep the bond or certificate of deposit in force or to maintain assets adequate to assure payment to producers for commodities purchased from or stored for them shall be grounds for the suspension or revocation of a license issued under this chapter.

Any person who engages in business as a commodity dealer or warehouseman without securing a license, or who does not have a valid license or is in violation of this chapter or the rules and regulations promulgated under this chapter, or who impedes, obstructs, hinders, or otherwise prevents or attempts to prevent the commissioner or the commissioner's duly authorized agent in the performance of that officer's duty in connection with this chapter or its rules and regulations, or any commodity dealer or warehouseman, or any officer, agent or employee of a commodity dealer or warehouseman, who refuses to permit inspection of that person's premises, books, accounts, or records as provided in this chapter commits a Class A misdemeanor. In case of a continuing violation or violations, each day that each violation occurs constitutes a separate and distinct offense.

Any commodity dealer or warehouseman, or officer, agent, or employee of a commodity dealer or warehouseman, who withholds records, keeps or files false records or who inaccurately alters records or presents to the department any materially false records commits a Class E felony.

It is the duty of each district attorney general to whom any violation is reported to cause appropriate proceedings to be instituted and prosecuted in the appropriate court without delay. Before the commissioner reports a violation for prosecution, the commissioner may give the commodity dealer or warehouseman, or the officer, agent or employee of the commodity dealer or warehouseman, an opportunity to present such person's views at a hearing.

The commissioner may file a complaint and apply for, and the appropriate court may grant, a temporary restraining order or preliminary or permanent injunction restraining any person from violating or continuing to violate any of the provisions of this chapter or any rules and regulations promulgated under this chapter, notwithstanding the existence of other judicial remedies. Any such injunction may be entered without notice and without bond.

The commissioner may prohibit a commodity dealer or warehouseman from disposing of any commodities owned, in whole or in part, or held or in that person's possession, whether owned in whole or in part, or may prohibit anyone from removing any commodities in which the commodity dealer or warehouseman or producers from which that person has purchased commodities have an interest; and shall have authority for the disposition of the commodities to carry out the intent of this chapter.

Acts 1989, ch. 232, § 9; 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 6; 2006, ch. 656, § 8.

Code Commission Notes.

The felony in this section has been designated as a Class E felony by authority of § 40-35-110, which provides that an offense designated a felony without specification as to category is a Class E felony. See also § 39-11-114.

The misdemeanor in this section has been designated as a Class A misdemeanor by authority of § 40-35-110, which provides that an offense designated a misdemeanor without specification as to category is a Class A misdemeanor. See also § 39-11-114.

Cross-References. Classification of offenses, § 40-35-110.

Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Penalty for Class E felony, § 40-35-111.

43-32-110. Use of price later contracts — Rules and regulations.

The commissioner may regulate the use of price later contracts by the promulgation of any rule or regulation the commissioner may deem necessary.

Acts 1989, ch. 232, § 10.